Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 2. Equine Infectious Anemia

§ 1181.
Certification required.

Any equine animal imported into the State or transported through the State shall be accompanied by a Certificate of Veterinarian Inspection. The certificate shall state that the equine animal has been tested negative for equine infectious anemia (EIA) by an accredited veterinarian.

Any equine animal purchased, sold, offered for sale, bartered, exchanged, or given away within the State, or imported for one of these purposes, shall be tested by an accredited veterinarian and certified as negative for equine infectious anemia in accordance with rules adopted by the Secretary as provided by subsection (f) of this section. A test for equine infectious anemia shall not be required when:

the transfer of ownership is between the owner of the animal and his or her spouse, child, or sibling and where the animal is not moved to new premises; or

the animal is consigned directly to slaughter.

Whenever the Secretary has reason to believe that any equine animal has been exposed to equine infectious anemia and that the animal may pose a threat to other equine animals, the Secretary may require that the animal be tested for equine infectious anemia by an accredited veterinarian or by a State or federal veterinarian approved by the Secretary.

The Secretary may require by rule that any equine animal transported to any fair, show, competition, or other gathering of equine animals be accompanied by a certificate that states that the equine animal has been tested and found negative for equine infectious anemia.

The Secretary shall establish by rule the form and manner of required certifications and the periods of time within which testing and certification of equine animals shall be accomplished.

The Secretary shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for the purchase by a livestock dealer for resale or for slaughter of equine not known to be tested for equine infectious anemia, as authorized by subsection (b) of this section. The rules shall include specifications governing equine quarantine facilities, procedures for equine animals of unknown EIA status intended for resale to be retested, procedures for handling equine animals of unknown EIA status purchased for slaughter, and record-keeping requirements for livestock dealers.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 39

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1995;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 3.

§ 1182.
Testing of equine animals.

Testing of equine animals for equine infectious anemia shall be done by an accredited veterinarian licensed in the State by means of a Coggins test or other test acceptable to the Secretary, at the owner’s expense.

Any equine animal found to be a reactor by means of a test under subsection (a) of this section shall be administered a second test in accordance with the applicable State and federal statutes, rules, or regulations.

Any equine animal found to be a reactor shall be quarantined in accordance with instructions of the Secretary between receipt of the results of the first and second tests. Any equine animal found to be a reactor to a second test shall continue to be quarantined until adequate arrangements are made for disposition of the animal in accordance with section 1183 of this title.

Any veterinarian who identifies an equine animal as a reactor shall report that animal to the Secretary in a form and manner to be prescribed by rule of the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 3.

§ 1183.
Disposition of reactors.

Any equine animal identified as a reactor through testing as provided in subsections 1182(a) and (b) of this title shall be humanely destroyed within seven days of the second test. The destruction of the animal shall be by a licensed veterinarian and shall be observed by the Secretary or an agent of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a reactor may be transported to an approved slaughterhouse or research facility where authorized by written permission of the Secretary. In granting permission, the Secretary may specify the conditions under which the animal shall be quarantined, transported, and destroyed.

Any licensed veterinarian who destroys any equine animal in accordance with the provisions of this section shall immediately report the destruction of the animal to the Secretary.

As an alternative to the destruction of animals under the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, reactors may be isolated permanently under quarantine from all other equine animals and shall be conspicuously freezebranded with the letters “EIA.” In no case shall this action be delayed for more than two weeks. The quarantine shall apply to all equine animals on the premises where the reactor is located and shall remain in effect until the reactor is destroyed or isolated under quarantine and the remaining equine animals are tested and found to be negative.

The provisions of this section shall be implemented by rule of the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 30

, § 3.

§ 1184.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of section 1181, 1182, or 1183 of this title shall be assessed an administrative penalty under section 15 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 30

, § 3.